Oklahoma, session 2026, SB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.6.
PROHIBITED AMMUNITION
Any concealed or unconcealed handgun when carried in a manner
authorized by the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and
when loaded with any ammunition which is either a restricted bullet
as defined by Section 1289.19 of this title or is larger than .45
caliber or is otherwise prohibited by law shall be deemed a
prohibited weapon for purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB123 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

puni shed for a criminal offense as provided by Section 1272 of this
title or any other applicable provision of law. In addition to any
criminal prosecution for a violation of the provisions of this
section, the licensee shall be subject to an administrative fine of
Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), upon a hearing and determination by
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation that the person is in
violation of the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB123 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)